Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201858-805
Bonds, defined.

Bonds means bonds,
notes, or other obligations of the authority issued under the Nebraska Educational, Health, and Social Services Finance
Authority Act, including refunding bonds, notwithstanding that the same may
be secured by the full faith and credit of an eligible institution or any
other lawfully pledged security of an eligible institution.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 8;

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2908;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 5;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1705;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 5.